Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB633.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. USMCR Mary A. Lidwell Memorial Bridge.(a) Findings.--The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) Private First Class Mary A. Lidwell was born October 11, 1923, in Amsbry and attended Gallitzin High School in 1942.(2) Private First Class Lidwell volunteered for the United States Marine Corps in 1943 and became a member of the Women's Aviation Reserve Squadron until she left the service in 1946. The Women's Aviation Reserve Squadron, located in El Toro, California, at the time, was tasked with repairing damaged airplanes during World War II. For her exemplary work, Private First Class Lidwell was awarded the 123456789101112131415161718 Congressional Rosie the Riveter Medal.(3) Private First Class Lidwell, at 101 years of age, continues to be an active member of her community in Ashville Borough by volunteering her time at her church, being involved in community projects, fundraising for charities and working with the VFW Ladies Auxiliary. She also served as the Ashville Borough Secretary and Treasurer for many years.(b) Designation.--The bridge, identified as Bridge Key 8387, carrying Pennsylvania Route 53 over Patty's Run in Gallitzin Township, Cambria County, is designated the USMCR Mary A. Lidwell Memorial Bridge.(c) Signs.--The Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs displaying the name of the bridge to traffic in both directions on the bridge.Section 2. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0633PN0643 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516